Utah statutes.
35A-7-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Business day" means a day on which state offices are open for regular business.

(2)  "Compensation" means payment owed by an employer for labor or services performed by an employee.

(3)  "Date of hire" means the date labor or services for compensation are first performed by the employee.

(4)  "Date of rehire" means the date labor or services for compensation are first performed by an employee who was previously employed by the employer but has been separated from that employment for at least 60 consecutive days.

(5) (a)  "Employee" means an individual who is an employee within the meaning of Chapter 24 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(b)  "Employee" does not include an employee of a federal or state agency performing intelligence or counterintelligence functions if the head of that agency determines that reporting the employee could endanger the safety of the employee or compromise an ongoing investigation or intelligence mission.

(6) (a)  "Employer" means any person or entity that is an employer as defined in Section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(b)  "Employer" includes any governmental entity and any labor organization.

(7) (a)  "Labor organization" means any entity as defined in Section 2(5) of the National Labor Relations Act.

(b)  "Labor organization" includes any entity or hiring hall that is used by agreement between the organization and an employer to carry out requirements described in Section 8(f)(3) of the National Labor Relations Act.

(8)  "Registry" means the centralized new hire registry created in Section 35A-7-103.



Amended by Chapter 107, 2012 General Session

